California, session 20252026, SB1255.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Supporting Latino students attending postsecondary educational institutions in California serves the interests of California’s economic growth.(b) Throughout the early and mid-20th century, Mexican American and other Latino students were routinely subjected to de facto school segregation, including separate “Mexican schools,” particularly in southern and central California, which prevented access to postsecondary education.(c) In the landmark Mendez v. Westminster School Dist. of Orange County (S.D. Cal. 1946) 64 F.Supp. 544, affd. Westminster School Dist. of Orange County v. Mendez (9th Cir. 1947) 161 F.2d 774 (Mendez v. Westminster), the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals found that segregation of Mexican American students in California public schools was unconstitutional.(d) The Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals ruling in Mendez v. Westminster established legal and evidentiary groundwork that influenced the United States Supreme Court’s decision in the landmark Brown v. Board of Ed. of Topeka, Shawnee County, Kan. (1954) 347 U.S. 483 (Brown v. Board of Education), which declared racial segregation in public education unconstitutional nationwide.(e) Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d, et seq.) continues to advance access and equality in education by prohibiting any person, on the ground of race, color, or national origin, from being excluded from participation in, being denied the benefits of, or being subject to discrimination under any program or activity receiving federal financial assistance.(f) The federal Developing Hispanic-Serving Institutions Program was created in 1992 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.) to recognize colleges and universities that enroll a significant proportion of Latino students and to strengthen their capacity to support student success through targeted institutional support.(g) Seventy years after the United States Supreme Court’s ruling in Brown v. Board of Education, Hispanic-Serving Institutions (HSIs) enroll large numbers of Latino students and have the highest concentrations of Native American, Black, Asian American and Pacific Islander, and low-income White students, making them among the most racially, ethnically, and economically diverse colleges and universities in the nation.(h) In California, over 170 HSIs play a critical role as vehicles of social mobility by expanding access to postsecondary education for low-income and first-generation students while developing a skilled workforce aligned with state and national economic needs.(i) California’s colleges and universities, public and private, play a critical role in producing the next generation of the state’s workforce and in sustaining economic growth by supplying the educated talent that drives innovation, productivity, and California’s gross domestic product.(j) HSIs include four-year and two-year higher education institutions.(k) California’s public postsecondary institutions, private postsecondary educational institutions, and independent institutions of higher education have been federally designated as HSIs, reflecting the significant and growing share of campuses meeting the federal Developing Hispanic-Serving Institutions Program’s enrollment thresholds.(l) Nationally, the federal Developing Hispanic-Serving Institutions Program is currently subject to proposals and policy actions that would significantly reduce, restructure, or eliminate the program, creating uncertainty for institutions that rely on it to support student success.(m) The federal government has a clear statutory obligation in the federal Developing Hispanic-Serving Institutions Program to provide funding for HSIs.(n) A March 12, 2024, United States Government Accountability Office report on HSIs underscores the need for increased and sustained investment, particularly given that many HSIs remain underfunded while serving a disproportionate share of underserved students. Accordingly, it is imperative to continue challenging the reappropriation of HSI-designated funds and to advocate for funding levels that are commensurate with the growing number of HSI campuses and the students they serve.SEC. 2. Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 66078) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 7.7. Designation of California Hispanic-Serving Institutions66078. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Designation of California Hispanic-Serving Institutions.66078.1. As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicant” means an eligible college or university that applies for a designation pursuant to this article.(b) “College or university” means a University of California, California State University, or California Community Colleges campus, or an independent institution of higher education. education, as defined in Section 66010.(c) “Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to this article.(d) “Managing entity” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.(e) “Normal time” means the time it would take a full-time student to complete the requirements for a degree or certificate offered by a college or university.(f) “Recipient” means a college or university that receives a designation pursuant to this article.66078.2. (a) The Designation of California Hispanic-Serving Institutions is hereby established to recognize colleges and universities that excel at providing academic resources to Latino students enrolled in degree or certificate programs offered by colleges and universities. This designation shall only be awarded to qualifying applicants by a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board.(b) An initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five academic years. Thereafter, a recipient may submit an application for renewal. A renewal designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five years.(c) An applicant is eligible for designation pursuant to this article if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:(1)Has at least 25 percent of the college’s or university’s enrolled student population identifying as Hispanic and Latino students.(2)(1) Submits an initial or renewal application, as applicable, to the managing entity on or before the application deadline established by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66078.3.(3)(2) Meets either of the following, as applicable:(A) Submits an initial application that complies with subdivision (d).(B) Submits a renewal application that complies with subdivision (e).(4)(3) Posts the initial or renewal application submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3), (2), as applicable, on the applicant’s internet website.(d) An initial application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s commitment to address Latino student success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.(2) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Latino students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the initial designation shall be valid.(3) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Latino students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable.(4) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid, on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) A mission statement that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Latino students.(B) Outreach services to Latino students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.(C) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the workforce development success of Latino students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.(D) An outline of the planned allocation of resources during the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.(E) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.(F) Academic curriculum, including incorporating and expanding curriculum and course offerings in ethnic studies and other culturally responsive coursework, to reflect the diverse backgrounds of Latino students and support their academic engagement and retention.(G) Research initiatives, including institutional research to address the needs of lived experiences of Latino populations, both on campus and in the broader community.(H) Data disaggregation collection and analysis to identify and address the distinct needs and achievement gaps of diverse Latino ethnic subgroups.(I) Intersegmental collaboration between the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, to strengthen the educational pipeline for Latino students, including support for transfer and the completion of undergraduate, graduate, and professional degrees.(5) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous three academic years for all students, and for Latino students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of the normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.(6) A community college applicant shall submit, in its application, all of the following for the previous three academic years:(A) The number of degree and certificate programs completed by all students, and by Latino students.(B) The number of all students, and of Latino students, who completed degree and certificate programs within the normal time and up to 300 percent of the normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.(C) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Latino students, to four-year colleges and universities.(7) A description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Latino students.(e) A renewal application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Either of the following, as applicable:(A) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of an initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that initial designation.(B) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of a renewal designation awarded pursuant to this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that previous renewal designation.(2) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to achieve the academic goals and academic equity goals provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to implement the strategic plan provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(4) Any changes made by the applicant to either of the following items provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1):(A) The mission statement in the strategic plan that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Latino students.(B) The description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Latino students.(5) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s continual commitment to address Latino student workforce development success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.(6) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Latino students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid.(7) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Latino students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as applicable.(8) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid, on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (6) and (7). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Outreach services to Latino students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.(B) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the academic success of Latino students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.(C) An outline of the planned allocation of resources for the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.(D) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.(E) Academic curriculum, including incorporating and expanding curriculum and course offerings in ethnic studies and other culturally responsive coursework, to reflect the diverse backgrounds of Latino students and support their academic engagement and retention.(F) Research initiatives, including institutional research to address the needs of lived experiences of Latino populations, both on campus and in the broader community.(G) Data disaggregation collection and analysis to identify and address the distinct needs and achievement gaps of diverse Latino ethnic subgroups.(H) Intersegmental collaboration between the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, to strengthen the educational pipeline for Latino students, including support for transfer and the completion of undergraduate, graduate, and professional degrees.(9) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous five academic years for all students, and for Latino students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of the normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.(10) A community college campus shall submit, in its application, all of the following for the previous five academic years:(A) The number of degree and certificate programs completed by all students, and by Latino students.(B) The number of all students, and of Latino students, who completed degree and certificate programs within the normal time and up to 300 percent of the normal time to degree completion yield, retention, and graduation rate.(C) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Latino students, to four-year colleges and universities.(f) (1) If an applicant’s renewal application is denied by the governing board, the applicant may only submit an application to receive an initial designation pursuant to this article.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an applicant described in paragraph (1) may submit an application for a renewal designation following the award of a subsequent initial designation by the governing board pursuant to this article.(g) An applicant is encouraged to inform and consult with the academic senate of the college or university on the applicant’s initial and renewal applications prepared pursuant to this article.66078.3. The office of the Chancellor of the California State University is hereby designated as the managing entity for initial and renewal designations pursuant to this article. The managing entity shall act as a neutral administrative body with the following duties:(a) Developing application processes that contain the requirements described in Section 66078.2 for applicants.(b) Accepting initial and renewal applications from applicants. The managing entity shall set two one application deadlines deadline each year on dates a date determined by the managing entity.(c) Processing each application received and presenting those applications to the governing board twice each year on dates determined by the governing board. at least once each year on a date determined by the governing board. The governing board may hold additional meetings to review additional applications at the discretion of the governing board.(d) Upon the governing board’s approval or denial of an applicant’s application, informing the applicant on this outcome.(e) Preparing and delivering to an applicant approved by the governing board to receive a designation pursuant to this article an appropriate insignia recognizing the designation.66078.4. (a) The governing board of the Designation of California Hispanic-Serving Institutions is hereby established. The purpose of the governing board is to award colleges and universities with designations pursuant to this article based on applications presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66078.3.(b) (1) The governing board shall be composed of all of the following eight members:(A) The Lieutenant Governor, or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee.(B) One member of the public, to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(C) One member of the public, to be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(D) A designee of the President of the University of California.(E) A designee of the Chancellor of the California State University.(F) A designee of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(G) A designee of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.(H) The chair of the California Latino Legislative Caucus, or the chair’s designee.(2) Any designee described in paragraph (1) shall be qualified to make decisions on behalf of that appointed position.(3) A member of the public appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) by either the Speaker of the Assembly or the President pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve a two-year term.(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that in appointing members of the public pursuant to paragraph (1), the appointing authority shall make every effort to ensure that the membership of the governing board includes persons who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the academic success of Latino students.(c) For purposes of the first two years of the governing board’s operations, the chair of the governing board shall be the Lieutenant Governor or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee. The governing board shall select each subsequent chairman chairperson from within its membership by a vote of two-thirds of the governing board’s voting members.(d) The governing board shall complete both of the following actions:(1)Convene twice a year to vote on the approval or denial of applications.(1) Convene at least once a year to vote on the approval or denial of applications of new or renewal applications that have been submitted to the managing entity at least 30 days before the meeting. The governing board may schedule additional meetings as necessary.(2) Approve or deny each application presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66078.3.(e) All decisions made by the governing board shall require a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board members who are present for the vote.(f) The governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).66078.5. This article shall only become operative upon an appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes.